Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1491
Landlord deliver possession of mobile home space.

At the commencement of the term of tenancy, the landlord shall deliver possession of the mobile home space to the tenant in compliance with the rental agreement and section 76-1492. The landlord may bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession and may recover the damages provided in section 76-14,105.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 42.